District of Columbia statutes.
29-305.23

Shares held by nominees.

(a)

A corporation may establish a procedure by which the beneficial owner of shares that are registered in the name of a nominee is recognized by the corporation as the shareholder. The extent of this recognition may be determined in the procedure.

(b)

The procedure may set forth:

(1)

The types of nominees to which it applies;

(2)

The rights or privileges that the corporation recognizes in a beneficial owner;

(3)

The manner in which the procedure is selected by the nominee;

(4)

The information that must be provided when the procedure is selected;

(5)

The period for which selection of the procedure is effective; and

(6)

Other aspects of the rights and duties created.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720